Utah statutes.
17D-1-305.   Compensation for administrative control board members.

An administrative control board member may receive compensation and reimbursement of expenses as provided in Section 17B-1-307 to the same extent as if the member were a member of a board of trustees of a local district.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

